Massachusetts, session 194th, H1586.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
230. Whoever gives or sells a tattooing, branding, or body piercing kit or other tattooing,
branding, or body piercing device to an unlicensed body art practitioner or a minor shall be
subject to a fine of not more than $500.
of 1